Illinois, session 104th, HB4888.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Records Act is amended by changing 5Sections 3, 7, and 10 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 205/3)  (from Ch. 116, par. 43.103)7    Sec. 3. Except where the context indicates otherwise, the 8terms used in this Act are defined as follows:9    "Agency" means any court, and all parts, boards, 10departments, bureaus and commissions of any county, municipal 11corporation or political subdivision.12    "Application for authority to dispose of local records" 13means an Agency-specific document that is created and approved 14by a commission and that provides a listing of all public 15records held by the Agency and their required retention 16timeframes. 17    "Archivist" means the Secretary of State.18    "Born-digital electronic material" means electronic 19material created in digital form rather than converted from 20print or analog form to digital form.21    "Commission" means a Local Records Commission.22    "Court" means a court, other than the Supreme Court.23    "Digitized electronic material" means electronic material   HB4888- 2 -LRB104 18197 RTM 31636 b1converted from print or analog form to digital form. 2    "Junk mail" means (i) any unsolicited commercial mail sent 3to a public body and not responded to by an official, employee, 4or agent of the public body or (ii) any unsolicited commercial 5electronic communication sent to a public body and not 6responded to by an official, employee, or agent of the public 7body. 8    "Officer" means any elected or appointed official of a 9court, county, municipal corporation or political subdivision.10    "Public record" means any book, paper, map, photograph, 11born-digital electronic material, digitized electronic 12material, electronic material with a combination of digitized 13and born-digital material, or other official documentary 14material, regardless of physical form or characteristics, 15made, produced, executed or received by any agency or officer 16pursuant to law or in connection with the transaction of 17public business and preserved or appropriate for preservation 18by such agency or officer, or any successor thereof, as 19evidence of the organization, function, policies, decisions, 20procedures, or other activities thereof, or because of the 21informational data contained therein. Library and museum 22material made or acquired and preserved solely for reference 23or exhibition purposes, extra copies of documents preserved 24only for convenience of reference, stocks of publications and 25of processed documents, and junk mail are not included within 26the definition of public record. Paper copies of registration   HB4888- 3 -LRB104 18197 RTM 31636 b1records, as defined in Section 1 of the Library Records 2Confidentiality Act (75 ILCS 70/1), shall not be considered 3public records once the information contained in the paper 4registration records is transferred into a secure electronic 5format and checked for accuracy. 6(Source: P.A. 104-438, eff. 1-1-26.) 7    (50 ILCS 205/7)  (from Ch. 116, par. 43.107)8    Sec. 7. Disposition rules. Except as otherwise provided by 9law, no public record shall be disposed of by any officer or 10agency unless in compliance with an application for authority 11to dispose of local records the written approval of the 12appropriate Local Records Commission is first obtained.13    The Commission shall issue regulations which shall be 14binding on all such officers. Such regulations shall establish 15procedures for notifying compiling and submitting to the 16Commission lists and schedules of public records disposed of 17in compliance with the application for authority to dispose of 18local records proposed for disposal; procedures for the 19physical destruction or other disposition of such public 20records; procedures for the management and preservation of 21electronically generated and maintained records; and standards 22for the reproduction of such public records by photography, 23microphotographic processes, or digitized electronic format. 24Such standards shall relate to the quality of the film to be 25used, preparation of the public records for filming or   HB4888- 4 -LRB104 18197 RTM 31636 b1electronic conversion, proper identification matter on such 2records so that an individual document or series of documents 3can be located on the film or digitized electronic form with 4reasonable facility, and that the copies contain all 5significant record detail, to the end that the copies will be 6adequate. Any public record may be reproduced in a microfilm 7or digitized electronic format. The agency may dispose of the 8original of any reproduced record providing: (i) the 9reproduction process forms a durable medium that accurately 10and legibly reproduces the original record in all details, 11that does not permit additions, deletions, or changes to the 12original document images, and, if electronic, that are 13retained in a trustworthy manner so that the records, and the 14information contained in the records, are accessible and 15usable for subsequent reference at all times while the 16information must be retained, (ii) the reproduction is 17retained for the prescribed retention period, and (iii) the 18Commission is notified when the original record is disposed of 19and also when the reproduced record is disposed of. 20    Such regulations shall also provide that the State 21archivist may retain any records which the Commission has 22authorized to be destroyed, where they have a historical 23value, and that the State archivist may deposit them in the 24State Archives, State Historical Library, or a university 25library, or with a historical society, museum, or library.26(Source: P.A. 99-147, eff. 1-1-16.)   HB4888- 5 -LRB104 18197 RTM 31636 b1    (50 ILCS 205/10)  (from Ch. 116, par. 43.110)2    Sec. 10. The head of each agency shall submit to the 3appropriate Commission, in accordance with the regulations of 4the Commission, lists or schedules of public records in his 5custody that are not needed in the transaction of current 6business and that do not have sufficient administrative, legal 7or fiscal value to warrant their further preservation. The 8head of each agency shall also submit lists or schedules 9proposing the length of time each records series warrants 10retention for administrative, legal or fiscal purposes after 11it has been received by the agency. The Commission shall 12determine what public records have no administrative, legal, 13research or historical value and should be destroyed or 14otherwise disposed of and shall authorize destruction or other 15disposal thereof. No public record shall be destroyed or 16otherwise disposed of in a manner contrary to law, and no 17public record shall be destroyed or otherwise disposed of by 18any Local Records Commission if not in compliance with the 19application for authority to dispose of local records on its 20own initiative, nor contrary to law. This Section shall not 21apply to court records as governed by Section 4 of this Act.22(Source: P.A. 85-1278.)